Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 5. Domestication.

Sec. 10.55.501.
Domestication authorized.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, by complying with AS

10.55.501

—

10.55.506

, a domestic entity may become a domestic entity of the same type in a foreign jurisdiction if the domestication is authorized by the law of the foreign jurisdiction.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, by complying with the provisions of AS

10.55.501

—

10.55.506

applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may become a domestic entity of the same type in this state if the domestication is authorized by the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of organization.

Unless the provision is amended after July 1, 2014, if a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic entity but does not refer to a domestication, the provision applies to a domestication of the entity as if the domestication were a merger.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.502.
Plan of domestication.

A domestic entity may become a foreign entity in a domestication by approving a plan of domestication. The plan must be in a record and contain

the name and type of the domesticating entity;

the name and jurisdiction of organization of the domesticated entity;

the manner of converting the interests in the domesticating entity into interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property, or any combination of interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property;

the proposed public organic document of the domesticated entity, if the domesticated entity is a filing entity;

the full text of the private organic rules of the domesticated entity that are proposed to be in a record;

the other terms and conditions of the domestication; and

any other provision required by the law of this state or the organic rules of the domesticating entity.

A plan of domestication may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.503.
Approval of domestication.

A plan of domestication is not effective unless it has been approved

by a domestic domesticating entity

in accordance with the requirements, if any, in the domestic domesticating entity’s organic rules for approval of a domestication;

if the domestic domesticating entity’s organic rules do not provide for approval of a domestication, in accordance with the requirements, if any, in its organic law and organic rules for approval of

in the case of an entity that is not a business corporation, a merger, as if the domestication were a merger; or

in the case of a business corporation, a merger requiring approval by a vote of the interest holders of the business corporation, as if the domestication were that type of merger; or

if neither the domestic domesticating entity’s organic law nor organic rules provide for approval of a domestication or a merger described in (B)(ii) of this paragraph, by all of the interest holders of the entity entitled to vote on or consent to any matter; and

in a record, by each interest holder of a domestic domesticating entity that will have interest-holder liability for liabilities that arise after the domestication becomes effective, unless, in the case of an entity that is not a business corporation or nonprofit corporation,

the organic rules of the entity in a record provide for the approval of a domestication or merger in which some or all of the entity’s interest holders become subject to interest-holder liability by the vote or consent of fewer than all of the interest holders; and

the interest holder voted for or consented in a record to that provision of the organic rules or became an interest holder after the adoption of that provision.

A domestication of a foreign domesticating entity is not effective unless it is approved in accordance with the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of organization.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.504.
Amendment or abandonment of plan of domestication.

A plan of domestication of a domestic domesticating entity may be amended

in the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; or

by the governors or interest holders of the entity in the manner provided in the plan; however, an interest holder that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the domestication is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change

the amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property, or any combination of interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, cash, or other property, to be received by any of the interest holders of the domesticating entity under the plan;

the public organic document or private organic rules of the domesticated entity that will be in effect immediately after the domestication becomes effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the interest holders of the domesticated entity under its organic law or organic rules; or

any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the interest holder in any material respect.

After a plan of domestication has been approved by a domestic domesticating entity and before a statement of domestication becomes effective, the plan may be abandoned

as provided in the plan; or

unless prohibited by the plan, in the same manner as the plan was approved.

If a plan of domestication is abandoned after a statement of domestication has been filed with the department and before the filing becomes effective, a statement of abandonment, signed on behalf of the entity, shall be filed with the department before the time the statement of domestication becomes effective. The statement of abandonment takes effect upon filing, and the domestication is abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of abandonment must contain

the name of the domesticating entity;

the date on which the statement of domestication was filed; and

a statement that the domestication has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.505.
Statement of domestication; effective date.

A statement of domestication shall be signed on behalf of the domesticating entity and filed with the department.

A statement of domestication must contain

the name, jurisdiction of organization, and type of the domesticating entity;

the name and jurisdiction of organization of the domesticated entity;

if the statement of domestication is not to be effective upon filing, the later date and time on which it will become effective, which may not be more than 90 days after the date of filing;

if the domesticating entity is a

domestic entity, a statement that the plan of domestication was approved in accordance with AS

10.55.501

—

10.55.506

; or

foreign entity, a statement that the domestication was approved in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of organization;

if the domesticated entity is a domestic filing entity, the domesticated entity’s public organic document, as an attachment;

if the domesticated entity is a domestic limited liability partnership, the domesticated entity’s statement of qualification, as an attachment; and

if the domesticated entity is a foreign entity that is not a qualified foreign entity, a mailing address to which the department may send any process served on the commissioner under AS

10.55.506(e)

.

In addition to the requirements of (b) of this section, a statement of domestication may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

If the domesticated entity is a domestic entity, the domesticated entity’s public organic document, if any, must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, except that it does not need to be signed and may omit any provision that is not required to be included in a restatement of the public organic document.

A plan of domestication that is signed on behalf of a domestic domesticating entity and meets all of the requirements of (b) of this section may be filed with the department instead of a statement of domestication and, on filing, has the same effect as a statement of domestication. If a plan of domestication is filed as provided in this subsection, references in this chapter to a statement of domestication refer to the plan of domestication filed under this subsection.

A statement of domestication becomes effective on the date and time of filing or the later date and time specified in the statement of domestication.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.506.
Effect of domestication.

When a domestication becomes effective,

the domesticated entity is

organized under and subject to the organic law of the domesticated entity; and

the same entity without interruption as the domesticating entity;

all property of the domesticating entity continues to be vested in the domesticated entity without assignment, reversion, or impairment;

all liabilities of the domesticating entity continue as liabilities of the domesticated entity;

except as provided by law other than this chapter or the plan of domestication, all of the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the domesticating entity remain in the domesticated entity;

the name of the domesticated entity may be substituted for the name of the domesticating entity in any pending action or proceeding;

if the domesticated entity is a filing entity, the domesticated entity’s public organic document is effective and is binding on its interest holders;

if the domesticated entity is a limited liability partnership, the domesticated entity’s statement of qualification is effective simultaneously;

the private organic rules of the domesticated entity that are to be in a record, if any, approved as part of the plan of domestication are effective and are binding on and enforceable by

the domesticated entity’s interest holders; and

in the case of a domesticated entity that is not a business corporation or nonprofit corporation, any other person that is a party to an agreement that is part of the domesticated entity’s private organic rules; and

the interests in the domesticating entity are converted to the extent and as approved in connection with the domestication, and the interest holders of the domesticating entity are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of domestication and to any dissenters’ rights they have under AS

10.55.109

and the domesticating entity’s organic law.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of the domesticating entity, the domestication does not give rise to any rights that an interest holder, governor, or third party would otherwise have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the domesticating entity.

When a domestication becomes effective, a person that did not have interest-holder liability with respect to the domesticating entity and that becomes subject to interest-holder liability with respect to a domestic entity as a result of the domestication has interest-holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of the entity and only for those liabilities that arise after the domestication becomes effective.

When a domestication becomes effective,

the domestication does not discharge any interest-holder liability under the organic law of a domestic domesticating entity to the extent the interest-holder liability arose before the domestication became effective;

a person does not have interest-holder liability under the organic law of a domestic domesticating entity for any liability that arises after the domestication becomes effective;

the organic law of a domestic domesticating entity continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest-holder liability preserved under (1) of this subsection as if the domestication had not occurred; and

a person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by the organic law or organic rules of a domestic domesticating entity with respect to any interest-holder liability preserved under (1) of this subsection as if the domestication had not occurred.

When a domestication becomes effective, a foreign entity that is the domesticated entity

may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any of the foreign entity’s liabilities; and

appoints the commissioner as the foreign entity’s agent for service of process for collecting or enforcing those liabilities.

If the domesticating entity is a qualified foreign entity, the certificate of authority or other foreign qualification of the domesticating entity is cancelled when the domestication becomes effective.

A domestication does not require the entity to wind up its affairs and does not constitute or cause the dissolution of the entity.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)